Arkansas, session 2025, HB1449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-6-207(a)(1)(B), concerning required
reports of contributions for candidates for state or district offices and
resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(B)(i) Beginning with the month of January of a calendar
year in which a candidate may be listed on any ballot for election, a monthly
report of all contributions received and expenditures made during that month.
However, for any month in which certain days of that month are included in a
preelection report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section or a
final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section, no monthly
report for that month shall be due.
(ii) In the case of a primary or runoff election,
*SSS065*
02/11/2025 8:17:29 AM SSS065

HB1449
those days of the month occurring after the date of the election shall be
carried forward and included in the next monthly report.
(iii) The monthly report shall be filed no later
than twenty (20) days after the end of each month, except that the final
report, covering the month during which an election is held, shall be filed
within thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the last election
is held at which the candidate seeks nomination and after the end of the
month in which the general election is held shall be filed as required in
subdivision (a)(1)(D)(i) of this section.
(iv) With respect to a special election, the
candidate shall file monthly reports under this section beginning with the
month in which the special election candidate's total campaign contributions
or expenditures exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-6-207(a)(1)(D)(i), concerning required
reports of contributions for candidates for state or district offices and
resulting from Initiated Act 1 of 1990, is amended to read as follows:
(D)(i) No later than the last day of the month twenty (20)
days after the end of the month following the month in which the candidate's
name has appeared on the ballot in any primary election, runoff election,
general election, or special election, or when only one (1) candidate
qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an
unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, a final report of covering all
contributions received and expenditures made for that election which have not
been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed through the month
following the month during which a primary election, runoff election, general
election, or special election is held.









02/11/2025 8:17:29 AM SSS065